Massachusetts, session 194th, H4061.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 175L of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 7. (a) The commissioner shall maintain a publicly accessible database for
certificates of insurance, which shall display: (i) the name of the person certified to be insured;
(ii) the name of the insurer; and (iii) the expiration date of the insurance policy.
(b) An insurer shall submit each certificate of insurance it issues to the commissioner for
inclusion in the database established pursuant to subsection (a). An insurer shall report to the
commissioner the name of the insurance broker or agent, if any, that sold the insurance policy.
The commissioner shall maintain a record of the certificates of insurance sold by each insurance
broker or agent.
(c) A certificate of insurance shall include a quick-response or QR code that directs a user
to the database maintained pursuant to subsection (a).
of 2

(d) A certificate of insurance shall include the number of employees employed by the
person certified as insured, and the estimated payroll per employee classification.
(e) An insurer shall report to the commissioner and the commissioner shall examine and
investigate pursuant to section 6 the activities of any person that the insurer reasonably believes
has: (i) committed insurance premium fraud; (ii) committed workers compensation fraud; (iii)
attempted to avoid an audit or investigation; or (iv) otherwise engaged in an act or practice
prohibited by this chapter.
(f) The commissioner shall promulgate any regulations, pursuant to chapter 30A,
necessary to implement this section.
of 2